Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 8. Flood Control Districts

§ 41-3-801.
Petition for establishment; notice of election; qualifications of voters; conduct of election.

A flood control district may be established under the procedures for petitioning, hearing and election of special districts, and subsequent elections shall be held, as set forth in the Special District Elections Act of 1994. The petition and notice of publication shall describe by metes and bounds, following as nearly as possible established school district boundaries, the lands to be included in said district.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 167, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-118; Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to construction of Glendo Reservoir and storage of water by United States, see §

41-1-101

.

As to public works and contractor's bond, see §§

16-6-101

through

16-6-121

.

As to county bond elections, see §

18-4-302

et seq.

As to registration of voters generally, see §§

22-3-101

through

22-3-118

.

§ 41-3-802.
Election of board of directors; number; term; quorum; bond; powers and duties generally; election of officers.

If the formation of the district is approved the board of county commissioners shall enter a finding to that effect upon its records after which the district shall be considered to be established and shall be empowered through its governing board of directors to acquire personal property and equipment for control purposes by gift, devise, bequest, donation, or purchase and to enter into contracts for the acquisition by purchase or lease, or otherwise, of personal property and equipment; to convey, lease and otherwise dispose of its property for flood control purposes and to establish sinking funds for the replacement of worn out or obsolete equipment; and upon the vote of a majority of the voters of the district voting at an election held as provided by W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

, the district shall be empowered to issue bonds for the purpose of purchasing equipment and supplies and for the operational expense of the district.

A district established under this act [§§

41-3-801

through

41-3-803

] shall acquire and hold property in the name of “ . . . . . Flood Control District of . . . . . County”, state of Wyoming, and the name and a record thereof shall be entered upon the board of county commissioners’ records of said county of the establishment of said district, such name to be selected by the board of directors of the district, and said district as established shall have power to sue and be sued by such name.

The election of officers shall be held at the same time as the election for formation of the district. At the election a board of six (6) directors shall be elected by written ballot, who shall serve without compensation to govern the affairs of the district until the first subsequent director election pursuant to W.S.

22-29-112

. At that election two (2) members of the board shall be elected for one (1) year, two (2) for two (2) years, and two (2) for three (3) years, so that each succeeding year the term of two (2) members will expire and two (2) members will be elected for a three (3) year term. Each year the board shall elect one (1) of its members secretary-treasurer. Before the secretary-treasurer enters on the discharge of his duties, he shall execute to the state of Wyoming, a bond with an approved corporate surety or three (3) or more sufficient sureties, to be approved by the district board of directors and in such penal sum as they may direct, which bond with the approval of the board endorsed thereon by their president, shall be filed in the office of the county clerk. It is further directed that four (4) members of this board shall constitute a quorum and that no business shall transpire without a quorum in attendance. Any expenditure of funds shall be made only by signed vouchers bearing the signatures of both president and secretary-treasurer.

At least thirty (30) days prior to the time for annual levy of general taxes by the board of county commissioners of the county wherein any such district is situated, the board of directors of such district shall certify to the board of county commissioners the amount of special mill levy, provided for in W.S.

41-3-803

, which said district board considers necessary for district operations during the following year.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 167, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-119; Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 41-3-803.
Special tax authorized; power of board to enter into cooperative agreements; authority to make rules and hire employees.

The board of county commissioners of the county wherein each district is situated shall, at the time of the annual levy of general taxes, levy an additional special tax upon the real property in the amount certified to it by the district board of directors under W.S.

41-3-802

, but not to exceed twelve (12) mills on each dollar of assessed valuation on all real property in the respective districts for the equipping and operational expenses of such district and for the payment of the bonded indebtedness of the same. The district board may receive voluntary donations and appropriations of money from any other source, and such donation hereinafter provided, by the county treasurer upon request of the district board. Nothing in this act [§§

41-3-801

through

41-3-803

] shall be construed to prohibit boards of county commissioners from appropriating funds, paying any money or cooperating with any district so established under this act for the purpose of controlling or eradicating floods and all aforementioned moneys shall be turned over to the county treasurer to be kept in a fund designated as “ . . . . . Flood Control District of . . . . . County Fund”. Authority for such appropriations, payments or cooperation by boards of county commissioners is hereby authorized.

Districts created under this act are authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with any federal, state, local, or private agency for the control and eradication of floods on highways, rights-of-way, rivers, streams, canals or ditches. Flood control district boards are hereby authorized and empowered to make and adopt rules and regulations necessary for carrying out the purposes and provisions of this act and to enforce such rules and regulations and shall file those rules with the county clerk for each county in which the district is located. The boards are hereby empowered to appoint employees and assistants as may be necessary and to fix their compensation.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 167, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-120; Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 2.

Severability. —

Laws 1955, ch. 167, § 4, reads: “It is hereby declared to be the legislative intention that if any portion, clause, phrase, section or sections of this act shall be judicially determined to be unconstitutional or invalid the remainder of the act shall continue in full force and effect.”